Wisconsin, session 2025, AB645.
do enact as follows:AB645,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB645,29Section 2. 20.255 (2) (bt) of the statutes is created to read:AB645,2,121020.255 (2) (bt) Grants for feasibility studies of consolidation or whole grade 11sharing. Biennially, the amounts in the schedule for the grant program under s. 12115.448.AB645,313Section 3. 115.448 of the statutes is created to read:AB645,2,1614115.448 Grants for feasibility studies of consolidation or whole grade 15sharing. (1) In this section, “eligible applicant” means an applicant for a grant 16under this section that is a consortium of 2 or more school boards.AB645,2,2117(2) (a) From the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (bt), the department shall 18award grants to reimburse eligible applicants for costs related to feasibility studies 19for school district consolidation or whole grade sharing agreements under s. 118.50. 20The department may not reimburse an eligible applicant in an amount exceeding 21$25,000.AB645,3,322(b) The department shall consider a professional financial analysis, which 1may include a population study, of how school district consolidation or a whole 2grade sharing agreement under s. 118.50 would affect the school districts governed 3by the eligible applicant, as a reimbursable cost under this subsection.AB645,3,64(3) To receive a grant under this section, an eligible applicant shall 5demonstrate to the department that each school board that is a member of the 6consortium has adopted a resolution under s. 117.08 (1) or 117.09 (1).AB645,3,77